Illinois, session 104th, SB650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The License to Read Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 12/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8License to Read Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-267, eff. 6-30-23.)